apertium-en-pl/apertium-en-pl.pl.dix.xml
    <pardef n="zdję/cie__ger">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cie</l>
          <r>ć<s n="ger"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cia</l>
          <r>ć<s n="ger"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciu</l>
          <r>ć<s n="ger"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cie</l>
          <r>ć<s n="ger"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciem</l>
          <r>ć<s n="ger"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciu</l>
          <r>ć<s n="ger"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cie</l>
          <r>ć<s n="ger"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cia</l>
          <r>ć<s n="ger"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ć</l>
          <r>ć<s n="ger"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciom</l>
          <r>ć<s n="ger"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cia</l>
          <r>ć<s n="ger"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciami</l>
          <r>ć<s n="ger"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciach</l>
          <r>ć<s n="ger"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cia</l>
          <r>ć<s n="ger"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     </pardef>
     <pardef n="czyt/ac__vblex">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>ać</l>
          <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asz</l>
          <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amy</l>
          <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>acie</l>
          <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ają</l>
          <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e><i>a</i><par n="imperative__v"/></e>
      <e><i>a</i><par n="past_sg__v"/></e>
      <e><i>a</i><par n="past_sg_n__v"/></e>
      <e><i>a</i><par n="past_pl_m__v"/></e>
      <e><i>a</i><par n="past_pl_nm__v"/></e>
      <e><i>a</i><par n="cni_sg__v"/></e>
      <e><i>a</i><par n="cni_sg_n__v"/></e>
      <e><i>a</i><par n="cni_pl_m__v"/></e>
      <e><i>a</i><par n="cni_pl_nm__v"/></e>
      
      <!-- Past tense impersonal form -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ano</l>
          <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Gerund -->
      <e><i>a</i><par n="czyta/nie__ger"/></e>
     </pardef>
     <pardef n="tani/eć__vblex">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>eć</l>
          <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eję</l>
          <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejesz</l>
          <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eje</l>
          <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejemy</l>
          <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejecie</l>
          <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eją</l>
          <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e><i>e</i><par n="imperative__v"/></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>e</r></p><par n="past_sg__v"/></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>e</r></p><par n="past_sg_n__v"/></e>
      <e><i>e</i><par n="past_pl_m__v"/></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>e</r></p><par n="past_pl_nm__v"/></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>e</r></p><par n="cni_sg__v"/></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>e</r></p><par n="cni_sg_n__v"/></e>
      <e><i>e</i><par n="cni_pl_m__v"/></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>e</r></p><par n="cni_pl_nm__v"/></e>
      
      <!-- Past tense impersonal form -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ano</l>
          <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Gerund -->
      <e><i>e</i><par n="czyta/nie__ger"/></e>
     </pardef>
     <pardef n="umi/eć__vblex">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>eć</l>
          <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ę</l>
          <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esz</l>
          <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emy</l>
          <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ecie</l>
          <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e><i>e</i><par n="imperative__v"/></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>e</r></p><par n="past_sg__v"/></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>e</r></p><par n="past_sg_n__v"/></e>
      <e><i>e</i><par n="past_pl_m__v"/></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>e</r></p><par n="past_pl_nm__v"/></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>e</r></p><par n="cni_sg__v"/></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>e</r></p><par n="cni_sg_n__v"/></e>
      <e><i>e</i><par n="cni_pl_m__v"/></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>e</r></p><par n="cni_pl_nm__v"/></e>
      
      <!-- Past tense impersonal form -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ano</l>
          <r>eć<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Gerund -->
      <e><i>e</i><par n="czyta/nie__ger"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="tanieć"><i>tani</i><par n="tani/eć__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="umieć"><i>umi</i><par n="umi/eć__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="przeczytać"><i>przeczyt</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="śrupać"><i>śrup</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="umierać"><i>umier</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="czekać"><i>czek</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="poczekać"><i>poczek</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zaczekać"><i>zaczek</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="korzystać"><i>korzyst</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skorzystać"><i>skorzyst</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="merdać"><i>merd</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pomerdać"><i>pomerd</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zamerdać"><i>zamerd</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="używać"><i>używ</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bujać"><i>buj</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dygać"><i>dyg</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kitrać"><i>kitr</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="szamać"><i>szam</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tyrać"><i>tyr</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="giglać"><i>gigl</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ślabrać"><i>ślabr</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ukrychać"><i>ukrych</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="taśtać"><i>taśt</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="klajdać"><i>klajd</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="szparać"><i>szpar</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skibać"><i>skib</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="przebierać"><i>przebier</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="przykinać"><i>przykin</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wyłączać"><i>wyłącz</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="chować"><i>chow</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zabijać"><i>zabij</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="znać"><i>zn</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="padać"><i>pad</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wystarczać"><i>wystarcz</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pożyczać"><i>pożycz</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wyobrażać"><i>wyobraż</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="umożliwiać"><i>umożliwi</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zapominać"><i>zapomin</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zdradzać"><i>zdradz</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wykonywać"><i>wykonyw</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zalesiać"><i>zalesi</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="odpierdalać"><i>odpierdal</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="podpierdalać"><i>podpierdal</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zapierdalać"><i>zapierdal</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="przeszkadzać"><i>przeszkadz</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spierdalać"><i>spierdal</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="srać"><i>sr</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kichać"><i>kich</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="działać"><i>dział</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nazywać"><i>nazyw</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="przyprawiać"><i>przyprawi</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="słuchać"><i>słuch</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="oddziaływać"><i>oddziaływ</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="posiadać"><i>posiad</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zaiwaniać"><i>zaiwani</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spieprzać"><i>spieprz</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dmuchać"><i>dmuch</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wyglądać"><i>wygląd</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tkać"><i>tk</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="żądać"><i>żąd</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="podwijać"><i>podwij</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pomagać"><i>pomag</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="przemieszczać"><i>przemieszcz</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="odczytywać"><i>odczytyw</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zapadać"><i>zapad</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wąchać"><i>wąch</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="otwierać"><i>otwier</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wybierać"><i>wybier</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nękać"><i>nęk</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zarabiać"><i>zarabi</i><par n="czyt/ac__vblex"/></e>
